Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-229.05
Adjudication of water rights; appeal.

An appeal may be taken from the decision of the Chief Water Officer upon such hearing as provided by section 61-207.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 2, § 9, p. 837;

C.S.1922, § 8428;

C.S.1929, § 81-6309;

R.S.1943, § 46-229;

Laws 1947, c. 172, § 1(6), p. 522;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 106;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 101;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 81.

This section does not violate constitutional notions of due process. In re Water Appropriation Nos. 442A, 461, 462, and 485, 210 Neb. 161, 313 N.W.2d 271 (1981).